Illinois, session 104th, HB5228.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 416 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/416)7    Sec. 416. Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission 8Operations Fund Surcharge. 9    (a) As of July 30, 2004 (the effective date of Public Act 1093-840), every company licensed or authorized by the Illinois 11Department of Insurance and insuring employers' liabilities 12arising under the Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' 13Occupational Diseases Act shall remit to the Director a 14surcharge based upon the annual direct written premium, as 15reported under Section 136 of this Act, of the company in the 16manner provided in this Section. Such proceeds shall be 17deposited into the Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission 18Operations Fund as established in the Workers' Compensation 19Act. If a company survives or was formed by a merger, 20consolidation, reorganization, or reincorporation, the direct 21written premiums of all companies party to the merger, 22consolidation, reorganization, or reincorporation shall, for 23purposes of determining the amount of the fee imposed by this   HB5228 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1Section, be regarded as those of the surviving or new company.2    (b) Beginning on July 30, 2004 (the effective date of 3Public Act 93-840) and on July 1 of each year thereafter 4through 2023, the Director shall charge an annual Illinois 5Workers' Compensation Commission Operations Fund Surcharge 6from every company subject to subsection (a) of this Section 7equal to 1.01% of its direct written premium for insuring 8employers' liabilities arising under the Workers' Compensation 9Act or Workers' Occupational Diseases Act as reported in each 10company's annual statement filed for the previous year as 11required by Section 136. Within 15 days after June 5, 2024 (the 12effective date of Public Act 103-590) and on July 1 of each 13year thereafter, the Director shall charge an annual Illinois 14Workers' Compensation Commission Operations Fund Surcharge 15from every company subject to subsection (a) of this Section 16equal to 1.092% of its direct written premium for insuring 17employers' liabilities arising under the Workers' Compensation 18Act or Workers' Occupational Diseases Act as reported in each 19company's annual statement filed for the previous year as 20required by Section 136. The Illinois Workers' Compensation 21Commission Operations Fund Surcharge shall be collected by 22companies subject to subsection (a) of this Section as a 23separately stated surcharge on insured employers at the rate 24of 1.092% of direct written premium for the surcharge due in 252024 and each year thereafter, plus an additional amount 26determined under subsection (b-5) beginning in 2026. The   HB5228 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission Operations Fund 2Surcharge shall not be collected by companies subject to 3subsection (a) of this Section from any employer that 4self-insures its liabilities arising under the Workers' 5Compensation Act or Workers' Occupational Diseases Act, 6provided that the employer has paid the Illinois Workers' 7Compensation Commission Operations Fund Fee pursuant to 8Section 4d of the Workers' Compensation Act. All sums 9collected by the Department of Insurance under the provisions 10of this Section shall be paid promptly after the receipt of the 11same, accompanied by a detailed statement thereof, into the 12Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission Operations Fund in 13the State treasury.14    (b-5) As used in this subsection:15    "Annual funding target for the year" means $7,000,000 for 162026 and, for each year thereafter, the previous year's annual 17funding target increased by 3.5%.18    "Statewide underwriting gain for the previous year" means 19the sum of the underwriting gains for all companies that had an 20underwriting gain for their workers' compensation and excess 21workers' compensation lines in this State, as reported in the 22companies' annual statements filed for the previous year under 23Section 136.24    "Underwriting gain" means, if the difference is a positive 25dollar amount, the difference between direct earned premiums 26and the sum of the following expenses and fees:  HB5228 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1        (A) direct losses incurred;2        (B) direct defense and cost containment expense 3    incurred;4        (C) commission and brokerage expenses; and5        (D) taxes, licenses, and fees.6    On or before July 1, 2026 or 15 days after the effective 7date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, 8whichever is later, and on or before July 1 of each year 9thereafter, in addition to the amount required by subsections 10(a) and (b), the Director shall charge an amount to be included 11in a company's obligation to pay the annual Illinois Workers' 12Compensation Commission Operations Fund Surcharge under this 13Section. The additional amount shall be collected from every 14company subject to subsection (a) that had an underwriting 15gain for its workers' compensation and excess workers' 16compensation lines in this State, as reported in the company's 17annual statement filed for the previous year under Section 18136. All provisions of this Section for the administration and 19enforcement of the portion of the annual Illinois Workers' 20Compensation Commission Operations Fund Surcharge described in 21subsection (b) shall apply to the additional amount described 22in this subsection. 23    The additional amount included in each company's surcharge 24for a given year shall be a percentage of the company's 25underwriting gain for its workers' compensation and excess 26workers' compensation lines in this State, as reported in the   HB5228 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1company's annual statement filed for the previous year under 2Section 136. Each year's percentage shall be calculated as the 3annual funding target for the year divided by the statewide 4underwriting gain for the previous year multiplied by 100.5    Before collecting the additional amount each year, the 6Department shall publish a company bulletin demonstrating the 7calculation of the percentage in accordance with this 8subsection. The bulletin shall include or contain a hyperlink 9to download the underlying data from the companies' annual 10statements that the Department used to perform the 11calculation.12    The additional amount included in the surcharge shall be 13deposited into the Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission 14Operations Fund in accordance with the Workers' Compensation 15Act. If a company survives or was formed by a merger, 16consolidation, reorganization, or reincorporation, the 17underwriting gain in this State for all companies that are 18parties to the merger, consolidation, reorganization, or 19reincorporation shall, for purposes of determining the 20additional amount imposed by this subsection, be regarded as 21those of the surviving or new company.22    (c) In addition to the authority specifically granted 23under Article XXV of this Code, the Director shall have such 24authority to adopt rules or establish forms as may be 25reasonably necessary for purposes of enforcing this Section. 26The Director shall also have authority to defer, waive, or   HB5228 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1abate the surcharge or any penalties imposed by this Section 2if in the Director's opinion the company's solvency and 3ability to meet its insured obligations would be immediately 4threatened by payment of the surcharge due.5    (d) When a company fails to pay the full amount of any 6annual Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission Operations 7Fund Surcharge of $100 or more due under this Section, there 8shall be added to the amount due as a penalty an amount equal 9to 10% of the deficiency for each month or part of a month that 10the deficiency remains unpaid.11    (e) The Department of Insurance may enforce the collection 12of any delinquent payment, penalty, or portion thereof by 13legal action or in any other manner by which the collection of 14debts due the State of Illinois may be enforced under the laws 15of this State.16    (f) Whenever it appears to the satisfaction of the 17Director that a company has paid pursuant to this Act an 18Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission Operations Fund 19Surcharge in an amount in excess of the amount legally 20collectable from the company, the Director shall issue a 21credit memorandum for an amount equal to the amount of such 22overpayment. A credit memorandum may be applied for the 2-year 23period from the date of issuance, against the payment of any 24amount due during that period under the surcharge imposed by 25this Section or, subject to reasonable rule of the Department 26of Insurance including requirement of notification, may be   HB5228 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1assigned to any other company subject to regulation under this 2Act. Any application of credit memoranda after the period 3provided for in this Section is void.4    (g) Annually, the Governor may direct a transfer of up to 52% of all moneys collected under this Section to the Insurance 6Financial Regulation Fund.7(Source: P.A. 103-590, eff. 6-5-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 8    Section 10. The Workers' Compensation Act is amended by 9changing Sections 4, 7, 8.7, and 12 as follows: 10    (820 ILCS 305/4)  (from Ch. 48, par. 138.4)11    (Text of Section from P.A. 101-40, 102-37, and 103-590)12    Sec. 4. (a) Any employer, including but not limited to 13general contractors and their subcontractors, who shall come 14within the provisions of Section 3 of this Act, and any other 15employer who shall elect to provide and pay the compensation 16provided for in this Act shall:17        (1) File with the Commission annually an application 18    for approval as a self-insurer which shall include a 19    current financial statement, and annually, thereafter, an 20    application for renewal of self-insurance, which shall 21    include a current financial statement. Said application 22    and financial statement shall be signed and sworn to by 23    the president or vice president and secretary or assistant 24    secretary of the employer if it be a corporation, or by all   HB5228 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    of the partners, if it be a copartnership, or by the owner 2    if it be neither a copartnership nor a corporation. All 3    initial applications and all applications for renewal of 4    self-insurance must be submitted at least 60 days prior to 5    the requested effective date of self-insurance. An 6    employer may elect to provide and pay compensation as 7    provided for in this Act as a member of a group workers' 8    compensation pool under Article V 3/4 of the Illinois 9    Insurance Code. If an employer becomes a member of a group 10    workers' compensation pool, the employer shall not be 11    relieved of any obligations imposed by this Act.12        If the sworn application and financial statement of 13    any such employer does not satisfy the Commission of the 14    financial ability of the employer who has filed it, the 15    Commission shall require such employer to,16        (2) Furnish security, indemnity or a bond guaranteeing 17    the payment by the employer of the compensation provided 18    for in this Act, provided that any such employer whose 19    application and financial statement shall not have 20    satisfied the commission of his or her financial ability 21    and who shall have secured his liability in part by excess 22    liability insurance shall be required to furnish to the 23    Commission security, indemnity or bond guaranteeing his or 24    her payment up to the effective limits of the excess 25    coverage, or26        (3) Insure his entire liability to pay such   HB5228 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    compensation in some insurance carrier authorized, 2    licensed, or permitted to do such insurance business in 3    this State. Every policy of an insurance carrier, insuring 4    the payment of compensation under this Act shall cover all 5    the employees and the entire compensation liability of the 6    insured: Provided, however, that any employer may insure 7    his or her compensation liability with 2 or more insurance 8    carriers or may insure a part and qualify under subsection 9    1, 2, or 4 for the remainder of his or her liability to pay 10    such compensation, subject to the following two 11    provisions:12            Firstly, the entire compensation liability of the 13        employer to employees working at or from one location 14        shall be insured in one such insurance carrier or 15        shall be self-insured, and16            Secondly, the employer shall submit evidence 17        satisfactorily to the Commission that his or her 18        entire liability for the compensation provided for in 19        this Act will be secured. Any provisions in any 20        policy, or in any endorsement attached thereto, 21        attempting to limit or modify in any way, the 22        liability of the insurance carriers issuing the same 23        except as otherwise provided herein shall be wholly 24        void.25        Nothing herein contained shall apply to policies of 26    excess liability carriage secured by employers who have   HB5228 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    been approved by the Commission as self-insurers, or2        (4) Make some other provision, satisfactory to the 3    Commission, for the securing of the payment of 4    compensation provided for in this Act, and5        (5) Upon becoming subject to this Act and thereafter 6    as often as the Commission may in writing demand, file 7    with the Commission in form prescribed by it evidence of 8    his or her compliance with the provision of this Section.9    (a-1) Regardless of its state of domicile or its principal 10place of business, an employer shall make payments to its 11insurance carrier or group self-insurance fund, where 12applicable, based upon the premium rates of the situs where 13the work or project is located in Illinois if:14        (A) the employer is engaged primarily in the building 15    and construction industry; and16        (B) subdivision (a)(3) of this Section applies to the 17    employer or the employer is a member of a group 18    self-insurance plan as defined in subsection (1) of 19    Section 4a.20    The Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission shall impose 21a penalty upon an employer for violation of this subsection 22(a-1) if:23        (i) the employer is given an opportunity at a hearing 24    to present evidence of its compliance with this subsection 25    (a-1); and26        (ii) after the hearing, the Commission finds that the   HB5228 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    employer failed to make payments upon the premium rates of 2    the situs where the work or project is located in 3    Illinois.4    The penalty shall not exceed $1,000 for each day of work 5for which the employer failed to make payments upon the 6premium rates of the situs where the work or project is located 7in Illinois, but the total penalty shall not exceed $50,000 8for each project or each contract under which the work was 9performed.10    Any penalty under this subsection (a-1) must be imposed 11not later than one year after the expiration of the applicable 12limitation period specified in subsection (d) of Section 6 of 13this Act. Penalties imposed under this subsection (a-1) shall 14be deposited into the Illinois Workers' Compensation 15Commission Operations Fund, a special fund that is created in 16the State treasury. Subject to appropriation, moneys in the 17Fund shall be used solely for the operations of the Illinois 18Workers' Compensation Commission, the salaries and benefits of 19the Self-Insurers Advisory Board employees, the operating 20costs of the Self-Insurers Advisory Board, and by the 21Department of Insurance for the purposes authorized in 22subsection (c) of Section 25.5 of this Act.23    (a-2) Every Employee Leasing Company (ELC), as defined in 24Section 15 of the Employee Leasing Company Act, shall at a 25minimum provide the following information to the Commission or 26any entity designated by the Commission regarding each   HB5228 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1workers' compensation insurance policy issued to the ELC:2        (1) Any client company of the ELC listed as an 3    additional named insured.4        (2) Any informational schedule attached to the master 5    policy that identifies any individual client company's 6    name, FEIN, and job location.7        (3) Any certificate of insurance coverage document 8    issued to a client company specifying its rights and 9    obligations under the master policy that establishes both 10    the identity and status of the client, as well as the dates 11    of inception and termination of coverage, if applicable. 12    (a-3) Any corporation, limited liability company, or 13partnership engaged in activities requiring licensure by a 14State agency, for which proof that it has insured its workers' 15compensation liability is a requirement for licensure, that 16fails to satisfy a requirement outlined in paragraph (1), (2), 17(3), or (4) of subsection (a) shall be subject to civil 18penalties under subsection (d) unless it shows by clear and 19convincing evidence that it was not operating during the time 20its license was active. 21    (b) The sworn application and financial statement, or 22security, indemnity or bond, or amount of insurance, or other 23provisions, filed, furnished, carried, or made by the 24employer, as the case may be, shall be subject to the approval 25of the Commission.26    Deposits under escrow agreements shall be cash, negotiable   HB5228 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1United States government bonds or negotiable general 2obligation bonds of the State of Illinois. Such cash or bonds 3shall be deposited in escrow with any State or National Bank or 4Trust Company having trust authority in the State of Illinois.5    Upon the approval of the sworn application and financial 6statement, security, indemnity or bond or amount of insurance, 7filed, furnished or carried, as the case may be, the 8Commission shall send to the employer written notice of its 9approval thereof. The certificate of compliance by the 10employer with the provisions of subparagraphs (2) and (3) of 11paragraph (a) of this Section shall be delivered by the 12insurance carrier to the Illinois Workers' Compensation 13Commission within five days after the effective date of the 14policy so certified. The insurance so certified shall cover 15all compensation liability occurring during the time that the 16insurance is in effect and no further certificate need be 17filed in case such insurance is renewed, extended or otherwise 18continued by such carrier. The insurance so certified shall 19not be cancelled or in the event that such insurance is not 20renewed, extended or otherwise continued, such insurance shall 21not be terminated until at least 10 days after receipt by the 22Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission of notice of the 23cancellation or termination of said insurance; provided, 24however, that if the employer has secured insurance from 25another insurance carrier, or has otherwise secured the 26payment of compensation in accordance with this Section, and   HB5228 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1such insurance or other security becomes effective prior to 2the expiration of the 10 days, cancellation or termination 3may, at the option of the insurance carrier indicated in such 4notice, be effective as of the effective date of such other 5insurance or security.6    (c) Whenever the Commission shall find that any 7corporation, company, association, aggregation of individuals, 8reciprocal or interinsurers exchange, or other insurer 9effecting workers' compensation insurance in this State shall 10be insolvent, financially unsound, or unable to fully meet all 11payments and liabilities assumed or to be assumed for 12compensation insurance in this State, or shall practice a 13policy of delay or unfairness toward employees in the 14adjustment, settlement, or payment of benefits due such 15employees, the Commission may after reasonable notice and 16hearing order and direct that such corporation, company, 17association, aggregation of individuals, reciprocal or 18interinsurers exchange, or insurer, shall from and after a 19date fixed in such order discontinue the writing of any such 20workers' compensation insurance in this State. Subject to such 21modification of the order as the Commission may later make on 22review of the order, as herein provided, it shall thereupon be 23unlawful for any such corporation, company, association, 24aggregation of individuals, reciprocal or interinsurers 25exchange, or insurer to effect any workers' compensation 26insurance in this State. A copy of the order shall be served   HB5228 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1upon the Director of Insurance by registered mail. Whenever 2the Commission finds that any service or adjustment company 3used or employed by a self-insured employer or by an insurance 4carrier to process, adjust, investigate, compromise or 5otherwise handle claims under this Act, has practiced or is 6practicing a policy of delay or unfairness toward employees in 7the adjustment, settlement or payment of benefits due such 8employees, the Commission may after reasonable notice and 9hearing order and direct that such service or adjustment 10company shall from and after a date fixed in such order be 11prohibited from processing, adjusting, investigating, 12compromising or otherwise handling claims under this Act.13    Whenever the Commission finds that any self-insured 14employer has practiced or is practicing delay or unfairness 15toward employees in the adjustment, settlement or payment of 16benefits due such employees, the Commission may, after 17reasonable notice and hearing, order and direct that after a 18date fixed in the order such self-insured employer shall be 19disqualified to operate as a self-insurer and shall be 20required to insure his entire liability to pay compensation in 21some insurance carrier authorized, licensed and permitted to 22do such insurance business in this State, as provided in 23subparagraph 3 of paragraph (a) of this Section.24    All orders made by the Commission under this Section shall 25be subject to review by the courts, said review to be taken in 26the same manner and within the same time as provided by Section   HB5228 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b119 of this Act for review of awards and decisions of the 2Commission, upon the party seeking the review filing with the 3clerk of the court to which said review is taken a bond in an 4amount to be fixed and approved by the court to which the 5review is taken, conditioned upon the payment of all 6compensation awarded against the person taking said review 7pending a decision thereof and further conditioned upon such 8other obligations as the court may impose. Upon the review the 9Circuit Court shall have power to review all questions of fact 10as well as of law. The penalty hereinafter provided for in this 11paragraph shall not attach and shall not begin to run until the 12final determination of the order of the Commission.13    (d) Whenever a Commissioner, with due process and after a 14hearing, determines an employer has knowingly failed to 15provide coverage as required by paragraph (a) of this Section, 16the failure shall be deemed an immediate serious danger to 17public health, safety, and welfare sufficient to justify 18service by the Commission of a work-stop order on such 19employer, requiring the cessation of all business operations 20of such employer at the place of employment or job site. If a 21business is declared to be extra hazardous, as defined in 22Section 3, a Commissioner may issue an emergency work-stop 23order on such an employer ex parte, prior to holding a hearing, 24requiring the cessation of all business operations of such 25employer at the place of employment or job site while awaiting 26the ruling of the Commission. Whenever a Commissioner issues   HB5228 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1an emergency work-stop order, the Commission shall issue a 2notice of emergency work-stop hearing to be posted at the 3employer's places of employment and job sites. Any law 4enforcement agency in the State shall, at the request of the 5Commission, render any assistance necessary to carry out the 6provisions of this Section, including, but not limited to, 7preventing any employee of such employer from remaining at a 8place of employment or job site after a work-stop order has 9taken effect. Any work-stop order shall be lifted upon proof 10of insurance as required by this Act. Any orders under this 11Section are appealable under Section 19(f) to the Circuit 12Court. 13    Any individual employer, corporate officer or director of 14a corporate employer, partner of an employer partnership, or 15member of an employer limited liability company who knowingly 16fails to provide coverage as required by paragraph (a) of this 17Section is guilty of a Class 4 felony. This provision shall not 18apply to any corporate officer or director of any 19publicly-owned corporation. Each day's violation constitutes a 20separate offense. The State's Attorney of the county in which 21the violation occurred, or the Attorney General, shall bring 22such actions in the name of the People of the State of 23Illinois, or may, in addition to other remedies provided in 24this Section, bring an action for an injunction to restrain 25the violation or to enjoin the operation of any such employer. 26    Any individual employer, corporate officer or director of   HB5228 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1a corporate employer, partner of an employer partnership, or 2member of an employer limited liability company who 3negligently fails to provide coverage as required by paragraph 4(a) of this Section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. This 5provision shall not apply to any corporate officer or director 6of any publicly-owned corporation. Each day's violation 7constitutes a separate offense. The State's Attorney of the 8county in which the violation occurred, or the Attorney 9General, shall bring such actions in the name of the People of 10the State of Illinois. 11    The criminal penalties in this subsection (d) shall not 12apply where there exists a good faith dispute as to the 13existence of an employment relationship. Evidence of good 14faith shall include, but not be limited to, compliance with 15the definition of employee as used by the Internal Revenue 16Service. 17    All investigative actions must be acted upon within 90 18days of the issuance of the complaint. Employers who are 19subject to and who knowingly fail to comply with this Section 20shall not be entitled to the benefits of this Act during the 21period of noncompliance, but shall be liable in an action 22under any other applicable law of this State. In the action, 23such employer shall not avail himself or herself of the 24defenses of assumption of risk or negligence or that the 25injury was due to a co-employee. In the action, proof of the 26injury shall constitute prima facie evidence of negligence on   HB5228 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1the part of such employer and the burden shall be on such 2employer to show freedom of negligence resulting in the 3injury. The employer shall not join any other defendant in any 4such civil action. Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 94th 5General Assembly shall affect the employee's rights under 6subdivision (a)3 of Section 1 of this Act. Any employer or 7carrier who makes payments under subdivision (a)3 of Section 1 8of this Act shall have a right of reimbursement from the 9proceeds of any recovery under this Section. 10    An employee of an uninsured employer, or the employee's 11dependents in case death ensued, may, instead of proceeding 12against the employer in a civil action in court, file an 13application for adjustment of claim with the Commission in 14accordance with the provisions of this Act and the Commission 15shall hear and determine the application for adjustment of 16claim in the manner in which other claims are heard and 17determined before the Commission. 18    All proceedings under this subsection (d) shall be 19reported on an annual basis to the Workers' Compensation 20Advisory Board. 21    An investigator with the Department of Insurance may issue 22a citation to any employer that is not in compliance with its 23obligation to have workers' compensation insurance under this 24Act. The amount of the fine shall be based on the period of 25time the employer was in non-compliance, but shall be no less 26than $500, and shall not exceed $10,000. An employer that has   HB5228 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1been issued a citation shall pay the fine to the Department of 2Insurance and provide to the Department of Insurance proof 3that it obtained the required workers' compensation insurance 4within 10 days after the citation was issued. This Section 5does not affect any other obligations this Act imposes on 6employers. 7    Upon a finding by the Commission, after reasonable notice 8and hearing, of the knowing and willful failure or refusal of 9an employer to comply with any of the provisions of paragraph 10(a) of this Section, the failure or refusal of an employer, 11service or adjustment company, or an insurance carrier to 12comply with any order of the Illinois Workers' Compensation 13Commission pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section 14disqualifying him or her to operate as a self insurer and 15requiring him or her to insure his or her liability, or the 16knowing and willful failure of an employer to comply with a 17citation issued by an investigator with the Department of 18Insurance, the Commission may assess a civil penalty of up to 19$500 per day for each day of such failure or refusal after the 20effective date of this amendatory Act of 1989. The minimum 21penalty under this Section shall be the sum of $10,000. Each 22day of such failure or refusal shall constitute a separate 23offense. The Commission may assess the civil penalty 24personally and individually against the corporate officers and 25directors of a corporate employer, the partners of an employer 26partnership, and the members of an employer limited liability   HB5228 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1company, after a finding of a knowing and willful refusal or 2failure of each such named corporate officer, director, 3partner, or member to comply with this Section. The liability 4for the assessed penalty shall be against the named employer 5first, and if the named employer fails or refuses to pay the 6penalty to the Commission within 30 days after the final order 7of the Commission, then the named corporate officers, 8directors, partners, or members who have been found to have 9knowingly and willfully refused or failed to comply with this 10Section shall be liable for the unpaid penalty or any unpaid 11portion of the penalty. Upon investigation by the Department 12of Insurance, the Attorney General shall have the authority to 13prosecute all proceedings to enforce the civil and 14administrative provisions of this Section before the 15Commission. The Commission and the Department of Insurance 16shall promulgate procedural rules for enforcing this Section 17relating to their respective duties prescribed herein. 18    If an employer is found to be in non-compliance with any 19provisions of paragraph (a) of this Section more than once, 20all minimum penalties will double. Therefore, upon the failure 21or refusal of an employer, service or adjustment company, or 22insurance carrier to comply with any order of the Commission 23pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section disqualifying him or 24her to operate as a self-insurer and requiring him or her to 25insure his or her liability, or the knowing and willful 26failure of an employer to comply with a citation issued by an   HB5228 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1investigator with the Department of Insurance, the Commission 2may assess a civil penalty of up to $1,000 per day for each day 3of such failure or refusal after the effective date of this 4amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. The minimum 5penalty under this Section shall be the sum of $20,000. In 6addition, employers with 2 or more violations of any 7provisions of paragraph (a) of this Section may not 8self-insure for one year or until all penalties are paid.9    A Commission decision imposing penalties under this 10Section may be judicially reviewed only as described in 11Section 19(f). After expiration of the period for seeking 12judicial review, the Commission's final decision imposing 13penalties may be enforced in the same manner as a judgment 14entered by a court of competent jurisdiction. The Commission's 15final decision imposing penalties is a debt due and owing to 16the State and can be enforced to the same extent as a judgment 17entered by a circuit court. The Attorney General shall 18represent the Commission and the Department of Insurance in 19any action challenging the final decision in circuit court. If 20the court affirms the Commission's decision, the court shall 21enter judgment against the employer in the amount of the fines 22assessed by the Commission. The Attorney General shall make 23reasonable efforts to collect the amounts due under the 24Commission's decision.25    Any individual employer, corporate officer or director of 26a corporate employer, partner of an employer partnership, or   HB5228 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1member of an employer limited liability company who, with the 2intent to avoid payment of compensation under this Act to an 3injured employee or the employee's dependents, knowingly 4transfers, sells, encumbers, assigns, or in any manner 5disposes of, conceals, secretes, or destroys any property 6belonging to the employer, officer, director, partner, or 7member is guilty of a Class 4 felony. 8    Penalties and fines collected pursuant to this paragraph 9(d) shall be deposited upon receipt into a special fund which 10shall be designated the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund, of 11which the State Treasurer is ex-officio custodian, such 12special fund to be held and disbursed in accordance with this 13paragraph (d) for the purposes hereinafter stated in this 14paragraph (d), upon the final order of the Commission. The 15Injured Workers' Benefit Fund shall be deposited the same as 16are State funds and any interest accruing thereon shall be 17added thereto every 6 months. The Injured Workers' Benefit 18Fund is subject to audit the same as State funds and accounts 19and is protected by the general bond given by the State 20Treasurer. The Injured Workers' Benefit Fund is considered 21always appropriated for the purposes of disbursements as 22provided in this paragraph, and shall be paid out and 23disbursed as herein provided and shall not at any time be 24appropriated or diverted to any other use or purpose. Moneys 25in the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund shall be used only for 26payment of workers' compensation benefits for injured   HB5228 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1employees when the employer has failed to provide coverage as 2determined under this paragraph (d) and has failed to pay the 3benefits due to the injured employee. The employer shall 4reimburse the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund for any amounts 5paid to an employee on account of the compensation awarded by 6the Commission. The Attorney General shall make reasonable 7efforts to obtain reimbursement for the Injured Workers' 8Benefit Fund. 9    Any such amounts obtained shall be deposited by the 10Commission into the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund. If an 11injured employee or his or her personal representative 12receives payment from the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund, the 13State of Illinois has the same rights under paragraph (b) of 14Section 5 that the employer who failed to pay the benefits due 15to the injured employee would have had if the employer had paid 16those benefits, and any moneys recovered by the State as a 17result of the State's exercise of its rights under paragraph 18(b) of Section 5 shall be deposited into the Injured Workers' 19Benefit Fund. The custodian of the Injured Workers' Benefit 20Fund shall be joined with the employer as a party respondent in 21the application for adjustment of claim. After July 1, 2006, 22the Commission shall make disbursements from the Fund once 23each year to each eligible claimant. An eligible claimant is 24an injured worker who has within the previous fiscal year 25obtained a final award for benefits from the Commission 26against the employer and the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund and   HB5228 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1has notified the Commission within 90 days of receipt of such 2award. Within a reasonable time after the end of each fiscal 3year, the Commission shall make a disbursement to each 4eligible claimant. At the time of disbursement, if there are 5insufficient moneys in the Fund to pay all claims, each 6eligible claimant shall receive a pro-rata share, as 7determined by the Commission, of the available moneys in the 8Fund for that year. Payment from the Injured Workers' Benefit 9Fund to an eligible claimant pursuant to this provision shall 10discharge the obligations of the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund 11regarding the award entered by the Commission. 12    (e) This Act shall not affect or disturb the continuance 13of any existing insurance, mutual aid, benefit, or relief 14association or department, whether maintained in whole or in 15part by the employer or whether maintained by the employees, 16the payment of benefits of such association or department 17being guaranteed by the employer or by some person, firm or 18corporation for him or her: Provided, the employer contributes 19to such association or department an amount not less than the 20full compensation herein provided, exclusive of the cost of 21the maintenance of such association or department and without 22any expense to the employee. This Act shall not prevent the 23organization and maintaining under the insurance laws of this 24State of any benefit or insurance company for the purpose of 25insuring against the compensation provided for in this Act, 26the expense of which is maintained by the employer. This Act   HB5228 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1shall not prevent the organization or maintaining under the 2insurance laws of this State of any voluntary mutual aid, 3benefit or relief association among employees for the payment 4of additional accident or sick benefits.5    (f) No existing insurance, mutual aid, benefit or relief 6association or department shall, by reason of anything herein 7contained, be authorized to discontinue its operation without 8first discharging its obligations to any and all persons 9carrying insurance in the same or entitled to relief or 10benefits therein.11    (g) Any contract, oral, written or implied, of employment 12providing for relief benefit, or insurance or any other device 13whereby the employee is required to pay any premium or 14premiums for insurance against the compensation provided for 15in this Act shall be null and void. Any employer withholding 16from the wages of any employee any amount for the purpose of 17paying any such premium shall be guilty of a Class B 18misdemeanor.19    In the event the employer does not pay the compensation 20for which he or she is liable, then an insurance company, 21association or insurer which may have insured such employer 22against such liability shall become primarily liable to pay to 23the employee, his or her personal representative or 24beneficiary the compensation required by the provisions of 25this Act to be paid by such employer. The insurance carrier may 26be made a party to the proceedings in which the employer is a   HB5228 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1party and an award may be entered jointly against the employer 2and the insurance carrier.3    (h) It shall be unlawful for any employer, insurance 4company or service or adjustment company to interfere with, 5restrain or coerce an employee in any manner whatsoever in the 6exercise of the rights or remedies granted to him or her by 7this Act or to discriminate, attempt to discriminate, or 8threaten to discriminate against an employee in any way 9because of his or her exercise of the rights or remedies 10granted to him or her by this Act.11    It shall be unlawful for any employer, individually or 12through any insurance company or service or adjustment 13company, to discharge or to threaten to discharge, or to 14refuse to rehire or recall to active service in a suitable 15capacity an employee because of the exercise of his or her 16rights or remedies granted to him or her by this Act.17    (i) If an employer elects to obtain a life insurance 18policy on his employees, he may also elect to apply such 19benefits in satisfaction of all or a portion of the death 20benefits payable under this Act, in which case, the employer's 21compensation premium shall be reduced accordingly.22    (j) Within 45 days of receipt of an initial application or 23application to renew self-insurance privileges the 24Self-Insurers Advisory Board shall review and submit for 25approval by the Chairman of the Commission recommendations of 26disposition of all initial applications to self-insure and all   HB5228 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1applications to renew self-insurance privileges filed by 2private self-insurers pursuant to the provisions of this 3Section and Section 4a-9 of this Act. Each private 4self-insurer shall submit with its initial and renewal 5applications the application fee required by Section 4a-4 of 6this Act.7    The Chairman of the Commission shall promptly act upon all 8initial applications and applications for renewal in full 9accordance with the recommendations of the Board or, should 10the Chairman disagree with any recommendation of disposition 11of the Self-Insurer's Advisory Board, he shall within 30 days 12of receipt of such recommendation provide to the Board in 13writing the reasons supporting his decision. The Chairman 14shall also promptly notify the employer of his decision within 1515 days of receipt of the recommendation of the Board.16    If an employer is denied a renewal of self-insurance 17privileges pursuant to application it shall retain said 18privilege for 120 days after receipt of a notice of 19cancellation of the privilege from the Chairman of the 20Commission.21    All orders made by the Chairman under this Section shall 22be subject to review by the courts, such review to be taken in 23the same manner and within the same time as provided by 24subsection (f) of Section 19 of this Act for review of awards 25and decisions of the Commission, upon the party seeking the 26review filing with the clerk of the court to which such review   HB5228 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1is taken a bond in an amount to be fixed and approved by the 2court to which the review is taken, conditioned upon the 3payment of all compensation awarded against the person taking 4such review pending a decision thereof and further conditioned 5upon such other obligations as the court may impose. Upon the 6review the Circuit Court shall have power to review all 7questions of fact as well as of law.8(Source: P.A. 101-40, eff. 1-1-20; 102-37, eff. 7-1-21; 9103-590, eff. 6-5-24..) 10    (Text of Section from P.A. 101-384, 102-37, and 103-590)11    Sec. 4. (a) Any employer, including but not limited to 12general contractors and their subcontractors, who shall come 13within the provisions of Section 3 of this Act, and any other 14employer who shall elect to provide and pay the compensation 15provided for in this Act shall:16        (1) File with the Commission annually an application 17    for approval as a self-insurer which shall include a 18    current financial statement, and annually, thereafter, an 19    application for renewal of self-insurance, which shall 20    include a current financial statement. Said application 21    and financial statement shall be signed and sworn to by 22    the president or vice president and secretary or assistant 23    secretary of the employer if it be a corporation, or by all 24    of the partners, if it be a copartnership, or by the owner 25    if it be neither a copartnership nor a corporation. All   HB5228 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    initial applications and all applications for renewal of 2    self-insurance must be submitted at least 60 days prior to 3    the requested effective date of self-insurance. An 4    employer may elect to provide and pay compensation as 5    provided for in this Act as a member of a group workers' 6    compensation pool under Article V 3/4 of the Illinois 7    Insurance Code. If an employer becomes a member of a group 8    workers' compensation pool, the employer shall not be 9    relieved of any obligations imposed by this Act.10        If the sworn application and financial statement of 11    any such employer does not satisfy the Commission of the 12    financial ability of the employer who has filed it, the 13    Commission shall require such employer to,14        (2) Furnish security, indemnity or a bond guaranteeing 15    the payment by the employer of the compensation provided 16    for in this Act, provided that any such employer whose 17    application and financial statement shall not have 18    satisfied the commission of his or her financial ability 19    and who shall have secured his liability in part by excess 20    liability insurance shall be required to furnish to the 21    Commission security, indemnity or bond guaranteeing his or 22    her payment up to the effective limits of the excess 23    coverage, or24        (3) Insure his entire liability to pay such 25    compensation in some insurance carrier authorized, 26    licensed, or permitted to do such insurance business in   HB5228 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    this State. Every policy of an insurance carrier, insuring 2    the payment of compensation under this Act shall cover all 3    the employees and the entire compensation liability of the 4    insured: Provided, however, that any employer may insure 5    his or her compensation liability with 2 or more insurance 6    carriers or may insure a part and qualify under subsection 7    1, 2, or 4 for the remainder of his or her liability to pay 8    such compensation, subject to the following two 9    provisions:10            Firstly, the entire compensation liability of the 11        employer to employees working at or from one location 12        shall be insured in one such insurance carrier or 13        shall be self-insured, and14            Secondly, the employer shall submit evidence 15        satisfactorily to the Commission that his or her 16        entire liability for the compensation provided for in 17        this Act will be secured. Any provisions in any 18        policy, or in any endorsement attached thereto, 19        attempting to limit or modify in any way, the 20        liability of the insurance carriers issuing the same 21        except as otherwise provided herein shall be wholly 22        void.23        Nothing herein contained shall apply to policies of 24    excess liability carriage secured by employers who have 25    been approved by the Commission as self-insurers, or26        (4) Make some other provision, satisfactory to the   HB5228 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    Commission, for the securing of the payment of 2    compensation provided for in this Act, and3        (5) Upon becoming subject to this Act and thereafter 4    as often as the Commission may in writing demand, file 5    with the Commission in form prescribed by it evidence of 6    his or her compliance with the provision of this Section.7    (a-1) Regardless of its state of domicile or its principal 8place of business, an employer shall make payments to its 9insurance carrier or group self-insurance fund, where 10applicable, based upon the premium rates of the situs where 11the work or project is located in Illinois if:12        (A) the employer is engaged primarily in the building 13    and construction industry; and14        (B) subdivision (a)(3) of this Section applies to the 15    employer or the employer is a member of a group 16    self-insurance plan as defined in subsection (1) of 17    Section 4a.18    The Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission shall impose 19a penalty upon an employer for violation of this subsection 20(a-1) if:21        (i) the employer is given an opportunity at a hearing 22    to present evidence of its compliance with this subsection 23    (a-1); and24        (ii) after the hearing, the Commission finds that the 25    employer failed to make payments upon the premium rates of 26    the situs where the work or project is located in   HB5228 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    Illinois.2    The penalty shall not exceed $1,000 for each day of work 3for which the employer failed to make payments upon the 4premium rates of the situs where the work or project is located 5in Illinois, but the total penalty shall not exceed $50,000 6for each project or each contract under which the work was 7performed.8    Any penalty under this subsection (a-1) must be imposed 9not later than one year after the expiration of the applicable 10limitation period specified in subsection (d) of Section 6 of 11this Act. Penalties imposed under this subsection (a-1) shall 12be deposited into the Illinois Workers' Compensation 13Commission Operations Fund, a special fund that is created in 14the State treasury. Subject to appropriation, moneys in the 15Fund shall be used solely for the operations of the Illinois 16Workers' Compensation Commission and by the Department of 17Insurance for the purposes authorized in subsection (c) of 18Section 25.5 of this Act.19    (a-2) Every Employee Leasing Company (ELC), as defined in 20Section 15 of the Employee Leasing Company Act, shall at a 21minimum provide the following information to the Commission or 22any entity designated by the Commission regarding each 23workers' compensation insurance policy issued to the ELC:24        (1) Any client company of the ELC listed as an 25    additional named insured.26        (2) Any informational schedule attached to the master   HB5228 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    policy that identifies any individual client company's 2    name, FEIN, and job location.3        (3) Any certificate of insurance coverage document 4    issued to a client company specifying its rights and 5    obligations under the master policy that establishes both 6    the identity and status of the client, as well as the dates 7    of inception and termination of coverage, if applicable. 8    (a-3) Any corporation, limited liability company, or 9partnership engaged in activities requiring licensure by a 10State agency, for which proof that it has insured its workers' 11compensation liability is a requirement for licensure, that 12fails to satisfy a requirement outlined in paragraph (1), (2), 13(3), or (4) of subsection (a) shall be subject to civil 14penalties under subsection (d) unless it shows by clear and 15convincing evidence that it was not operating during the time 16its license was active. 17    (b) The sworn application and financial statement, or 18security, indemnity or bond, or amount of insurance, or other 19provisions, filed, furnished, carried, or made by the 20employer, as the case may be, shall be subject to the approval 21of the Commission.22    Deposits under escrow agreements shall be cash, negotiable 23United States government bonds or negotiable general 24obligation bonds of the State of Illinois. Such cash or bonds 25shall be deposited in escrow with any State or National Bank or 26Trust Company having trust authority in the State of Illinois.  HB5228 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    Upon the approval of the sworn application and financial 2statement, security, indemnity or bond or amount of insurance, 3filed, furnished or carried, as the case may be, the 4Commission shall send to the employer written notice of its 5approval thereof. The certificate of compliance by the 6employer with the provisions of subparagraphs (2) and (3) of 7paragraph (a) of this Section shall be delivered by the 8insurance carrier to the Illinois Workers' Compensation 9Commission within five days after the effective date of the 10policy so certified. The insurance so certified shall cover 11all compensation liability occurring during the time that the 12insurance is in effect and no further certificate need be 13filed in case such insurance is renewed, extended or otherwise 14continued by such carrier. The insurance so certified shall 15not be cancelled or in the event that such insurance is not 16renewed, extended or otherwise continued, such insurance shall 17not be terminated until at least 10 days after receipt by the 18Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission of notice of the 19cancellation or termination of said insurance; provided, 20however, that if the employer has secured insurance from 21another insurance carrier, or has otherwise secured the 22payment of compensation in accordance with this Section, and 23such insurance or other security becomes effective prior to 24the expiration of the 10 days, cancellation or termination 25may, at the option of the insurance carrier indicated in such 26notice, be effective as of the effective date of such other   HB5228 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1insurance or security.2    (c) Whenever the Commission shall find that any 3corporation, company, association, aggregation of individuals, 4reciprocal or interinsurers exchange, or other insurer 5effecting workers' compensation insurance in this State shall 6be insolvent, financially unsound, or unable to fully meet all 7payments and liabilities assumed or to be assumed for 8compensation insurance in this State, or shall practice a 9policy of delay or unfairness toward employees in the 10adjustment, settlement, or payment of benefits due such 11employees, the Commission may after reasonable notice and 12hearing order and direct that such corporation, company, 13association, aggregation of individuals, reciprocal or 14interinsurers exchange, or insurer, shall from and after a 15date fixed in such order discontinue the writing of any such 16workers' compensation insurance in this State. Subject to such 17modification of the order as the Commission may later make on 18review of the order, as herein provided, it shall thereupon be 19unlawful for any such corporation, company, association, 20aggregation of individuals, reciprocal or interinsurers 21exchange, or insurer to effect any workers' compensation 22insurance in this State. A copy of the order shall be served 23upon the Director of Insurance by registered mail. Whenever 24the Commission finds that any service or adjustment company 25used or employed by a self-insured employer or by an insurance 26carrier to process, adjust, investigate, compromise or   HB5228 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1otherwise handle claims under this Act, has practiced or is 2practicing a policy of delay or unfairness toward employees in 3the adjustment, settlement or payment of benefits due such 4employees, the Commission may after reasonable notice and 5hearing order and direct that such service or adjustment 6company shall from and after a date fixed in such order be 7prohibited from processing, adjusting, investigating, 8compromising or otherwise handling claims under this Act.9    Whenever the Commission finds that any self-insured 10employer has practiced or is practicing delay or unfairness 11toward employees in the adjustment, settlement or payment of 12benefits due such employees, the Commission may, after 13reasonable notice and hearing, order and direct that after a 14date fixed in the order such self-insured employer shall be 15disqualified to operate as a self-insurer and shall be 16required to insure his entire liability to pay compensation in 17some insurance carrier authorized, licensed and permitted to 18do such insurance business in this State, as provided in 19subparagraph 3 of paragraph (a) of this Section.20    All orders made by the Commission under this Section shall 21be subject to review by the courts, said review to be taken in 22the same manner and within the same time as provided by Section 2319 of this Act for review of awards and decisions of the 24Commission, upon the party seeking the review filing with the 25clerk of the court to which said review is taken a bond in an 26amount to be fixed and approved by the court to which the   HB5228 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1review is taken, conditioned upon the payment of all 2compensation awarded against the person taking said review 3pending a decision thereof and further conditioned upon such 4other obligations as the court may impose. Upon the review the 5Circuit Court shall have power to review all questions of fact 6as well as of law. The penalty hereinafter provided for in this 7paragraph shall not attach and shall not begin to run until the 8final determination of the order of the Commission.9    (d) Whenever a panel of 3 Commissioners comprised of one 10member of the employing class, one representative of a labor 11organization recognized under the National Labor Relations Act 12or an attorney who has represented labor organizations or has 13represented employees in workers' compensation cases, and one 14member not identified with either the employing class or a 15labor organization, with due process and after a hearing, 16determines an employer has knowingly failed to provide 17coverage as required by paragraph (a) of this Section, the 18failure shall be deemed an immediate serious danger to public 19health, safety, and welfare sufficient to justify service by 20the Commission of a work-stop order on such employer, 21requiring the cessation of all business operations of such 22employer at the place of employment or job site. Any law 23enforcement agency in the State shall, at the request of the 24Commission, render any assistance necessary to carry out the 25provisions of this Section, including, but not limited to, 26preventing any employee of such employer from remaining at a   HB5228 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1place of employment or job site after a work-stop order has 2taken effect. Any work-stop order shall be lifted upon proof 3of insurance as required by this Act. Any orders under this 4Section are appealable under Section 19(f) to the Circuit 5Court. 6    Any individual employer, corporate officer or director of 7a corporate employer, partner of an employer partnership, or 8member of an employer limited liability company who knowingly 9fails to provide coverage as required by paragraph (a) of this 10Section is guilty of a Class 4 felony. This provision shall not 11apply to any corporate officer or director of any 12publicly-owned corporation. Each day's violation constitutes a 13separate offense. The State's Attorney of the county in which 14the violation occurred, or the Attorney General, shall bring 15such actions in the name of the People of the State of 16Illinois, or may, in addition to other remedies provided in 17this Section, bring an action for an injunction to restrain 18the violation or to enjoin the operation of any such employer. 19    Any individual employer, corporate officer or director of 20a corporate employer, partner of an employer partnership, or 21member of an employer limited liability company who 22negligently fails to provide coverage as required by paragraph 23(a) of this Section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. This 24provision shall not apply to any corporate officer or director 25of any publicly-owned corporation. Each day's violation 26constitutes a separate offense. The State's Attorney of the   HB5228 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1county in which the violation occurred, or the Attorney 2General, shall bring such actions in the name of the People of 3the State of Illinois. 4    The criminal penalties in this subsection (d) shall not 5apply where there exists a good faith dispute as to the 6existence of an employment relationship. Evidence of good 7faith shall include, but not be limited to, compliance with 8the definition of employee as used by the Internal Revenue 9Service. 10    Employers who are subject to and who knowingly fail to 11comply with this Section shall not be entitled to the benefits 12of this Act during the period of noncompliance, but shall be 13liable in an action under any other applicable law of this 14State. In the action, such employer shall not avail himself or 15herself of the defenses of assumption of risk or negligence or 16that the injury was due to a co-employee. In the action, proof 17of the injury shall constitute prima facie evidence of 18negligence on the part of such employer and the burden shall be 19on such employer to show freedom of negligence resulting in 20the injury. The employer shall not join any other defendant in 21any such civil action. Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 2294th General Assembly shall affect the employee's rights under 23subdivision (a)3 of Section 1 of this Act. Any employer or 24carrier who makes payments under subdivision (a)3 of Section 1 25of this Act shall have a right of reimbursement from the 26proceeds of any recovery under this Section.   HB5228 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    An employee of an uninsured employer, or the employee's 2dependents in case death ensued, may, instead of proceeding 3against the employer in a civil action in court, file an 4application for adjustment of claim with the Commission in 5accordance with the provisions of this Act and the Commission 6shall hear and determine the application for adjustment of 7claim in the manner in which other claims are heard and 8determined before the Commission. 9    All proceedings under this subsection (d) shall be 10reported on an annual basis to the Workers' Compensation 11Advisory Board. 12    An investigator with the Department of Insurance may issue 13a citation to any employer that is not in compliance with its 14obligation to have workers' compensation insurance under this 15Act. The amount of the fine shall be based on the period of 16time the employer was in non-compliance, but shall be no less 17than $500, and shall not exceed $2,500. An employer that has 18been issued a citation shall pay the fine to the Department of 19Insurance and provide to the Department of Insurance proof 20that it obtained the required workers' compensation insurance 21within 10 days after the citation was issued. This Section 22does not affect any other obligations this Act imposes on 23employers. 24    Upon a finding by the Commission, after reasonable notice 25and hearing, of the knowing and wilful failure or refusal of an 26employer to comply with any of the provisions of paragraph (a)   HB5228 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1of this Section, the failure or refusal of an employer, 2service or adjustment company, or an insurance carrier to 3comply with any order of the Illinois Workers' Compensation 4Commission pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section 5disqualifying him or her to operate as a self insurer and 6requiring him or her to insure his or her liability, or the 7knowing and willful failure of an employer to comply with a 8citation issued by an investigator with the Department of 9Insurance, the Commission may assess a civil penalty of up to 10$500 per day for each day of such failure or refusal after the 11effective date of this amendatory Act of 1989. The minimum 12penalty under this Section shall be the sum of $10,000. Each 13day of such failure or refusal shall constitute a separate 14offense. The Commission may assess the civil penalty 15personally and individually against the corporate officers and 16directors of a corporate employer, the partners of an employer 17partnership, and the members of an employer limited liability 18company, after a finding of a knowing and willful refusal or 19failure of each such named corporate officer, director, 20partner, or member to comply with this Section. The liability 21for the assessed penalty shall be against the named employer 22first, and if the named employer fails or refuses to pay the 23penalty to the Commission within 30 days after the final order 24of the Commission, then the named corporate officers, 25directors, partners, or members who have been found to have 26knowingly and willfully refused or failed to comply with this   HB5228 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1Section shall be liable for the unpaid penalty or any unpaid 2portion of the penalty. Upon investigation by the Department 3of Insurance, the Attorney General shall have the authority to 4prosecute all proceedings to enforce the civil and 5administrative provisions of this Section before the 6Commission. The Commission and the Department of Insurance 7shall promulgate procedural rules for enforcing this Section 8relating to their respective duties prescribed herein. 9    A Commission decision imposing penalties under this 10Section may be judicially reviewed only as described in 11Section 19(f). After expiration of the period for seeking 12judicial review, the Commission's final decision imposing 13penalties may be enforced in the same manner as a judgment 14entered by a court of competent jurisdiction. The Commission's 15final decision imposing penalties is a debt due and owing to 16the State and can be enforced to the same extent as a judgment 17entered by a circuit court. The Attorney General shall 18represent the Commission and the Department of Insurance in 19any action challenging the final decision in circuit court. If 20the court affirms the Commission's decision, the court shall 21enter judgment against the employer in the amount of the fines 22assessed by the Commission. The Attorney General shall make 23reasonable efforts to collect the amounts due under the 24Commission's decision.25    Any individual employer, corporate officer or director of 26a corporate employer, partner of an employer partnership, or   HB5228 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1member of an employer limited liability company who, with the 2intent to avoid payment of compensation under this Act to an 3injured employee or the employee's dependents, knowingly 4transfers, sells, encumbers, assigns, or in any manner 5disposes of, conceals, secretes, or destroys any property 6belonging to the employer, officer, director, partner, or 7member is guilty of a Class 4 felony. 8    Penalties and fines collected pursuant to this paragraph 9(d) shall be deposited upon receipt into a special fund which 10shall be designated the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund, of 11which the State Treasurer is ex-officio custodian, such 12special fund to be held and disbursed in accordance with this 13paragraph (d) for the purposes hereinafter stated in this 14paragraph (d), upon the final order of the Commission. The 15Injured Workers' Benefit Fund shall be deposited the same as 16are State funds and any interest accruing thereon shall be 17added thereto every 6 months. The Injured Workers' Benefit 18Fund is subject to audit the same as State funds and accounts 19and is protected by the general bond given by the State 20Treasurer. The Injured Workers' Benefit Fund is considered 21always appropriated for the purposes of disbursements as 22provided in this paragraph, and shall be paid out and 23disbursed as herein provided and shall not at any time be 24appropriated or diverted to any other use or purpose. Moneys 25in the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund shall be used only for 26payment of workers' compensation benefits for injured   HB5228 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1employees when the employer has failed to provide coverage as 2determined under this paragraph (d) and has failed to pay the 3benefits due to the injured employee. The employer shall 4reimburse the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund for any amounts 5paid to an employee on account of the compensation awarded by 6the Commission. The Attorney General shall make reasonable 7efforts to obtain reimbursement for the Injured Workers' 8Benefit Fund.9    Any such amounts obtained shall be deposited by the 10Commission into the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund. If an 11injured employee or his or her personal representative 12receives payment from the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund, the 13State of Illinois has the same rights under paragraph (b) of 14Section 5 that the employer who failed to pay the benefits due 15to the injured employee would have had if the employer had paid 16those benefits, and any moneys recovered by the State as a 17result of the State's exercise of its rights under paragraph 18(b) of Section 5 shall be deposited into the Injured Workers' 19Benefit Fund. The custodian of the Injured Workers' Benefit 20Fund shall be joined with the employer as a party respondent in 21the application for adjustment of claim. After July 1, 2006, 22the Commission shall make disbursements from the Fund once 23each year to each eligible claimant. An eligible claimant is 24an injured worker who has within the previous fiscal year 25obtained a final award for benefits from the Commission 26against the employer and the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund and   HB5228 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1has notified the Commission within 90 days of receipt of such 2award. Within a reasonable time after the end of each fiscal 3year, the Commission shall make a disbursement to each 4eligible claimant. At the time of disbursement, if there are 5insufficient moneys in the Fund to pay all claims, each 6eligible claimant shall receive a pro-rata share, as 7determined by the Commission, of the available moneys in the 8Fund for that year. Payment from the Injured Workers' Benefit 9Fund to an eligible claimant pursuant to this provision shall 10discharge the obligations of the Injured Workers' Benefit Fund 11regarding the award entered by the Commission. 12    (e) This Act shall not affect or disturb the continuance 13of any existing insurance, mutual aid, benefit, or relief 14association or department, whether maintained in whole or in 15part by the employer or whether maintained by the employees, 16the payment of benefits of such association or department 17being guaranteed by the employer or by some person, firm or 18corporation for him or her: Provided, the employer contributes 19to such association or department an amount not less than the 20full compensation herein provided, exclusive of the cost of 21the maintenance of such association or department and without 22any expense to the employee. This Act shall not prevent the 23organization and maintaining under the insurance laws of this 24State of any benefit or insurance company for the purpose of 25insuring against the compensation provided for in this Act, 26the expense of which is maintained by the employer. This Act   HB5228 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1shall not prevent the organization or maintaining under the 2insurance laws of this State of any voluntary mutual aid, 3benefit or relief association among employees for the payment 4of additional accident or sick benefits.5    (f) No existing insurance, mutual aid, benefit or relief 6association or department shall, by reason of anything herein 7contained, be authorized to discontinue its operation without 8first discharging its obligations to any and all persons 9carrying insurance in the same or entitled to relief or 10benefits therein.11    (g) Any contract, oral, written or implied, of employment 12providing for relief benefit, or insurance or any other device 13whereby the employee is required to pay any premium or 14premiums for insurance against the compensation provided for 15in this Act shall be null and void. Any employer withholding 16from the wages of any employee any amount for the purpose of 17paying any such premium shall be guilty of a Class B 18misdemeanor.19    In the event the employer does not pay the compensation 20for which he or she is liable, then an insurance company, 21association or insurer which may have insured such employer 22against such liability shall become primarily liable to pay to 23the employee, his or her personal representative or 24beneficiary the compensation required by the provisions of 25this Act to be paid by such employer. The insurance carrier may 26be made a party to the proceedings in which the employer is a   HB5228 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1party and an award may be entered jointly against the employer 2and the insurance carrier.3    (h) It shall be unlawful for any employer, insurance 4company or service or adjustment company to interfere with, 5restrain or coerce an employee in any manner whatsoever in the 6exercise of the rights or remedies granted to him or her by 7this Act or to discriminate, attempt to discriminate, or 8threaten to discriminate against an employee in any way 9because of his or her exercise of the rights or remedies 10granted to him or her by this Act.11    It shall be unlawful for any employer, individually or 12through any insurance company or service or adjustment 13company, to discharge or to threaten to discharge, or to 14refuse to rehire or recall to active service in a suitable 15capacity an employee because of the exercise of his or her 16rights or remedies granted to him or her by this Act.17    (i) If an employer elects to obtain a life insurance 18policy on his employees, he may also elect to apply such 19benefits in satisfaction of all or a portion of the death 20benefits payable under this Act, in which case, the employer's 21compensation premium shall be reduced accordingly.22    (j) Within 45 days of receipt of an initial application or 23application to renew self-insurance privileges the 24Self-Insurers Advisory Board shall review and submit for 25approval by the Chairman of the Commission recommendations of 26disposition of all initial applications to self-insure and all   HB5228 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1applications to renew self-insurance privileges filed by 2private self-insurers pursuant to the provisions of this 3Section and Section 4a-9 of this Act. Each private 4self-insurer shall submit with its initial and renewal 5applications the application fee required by Section 4a-4 of 6this Act.7    The Chairman of the Commission shall promptly act upon all 8initial applications and applications for renewal in full 9accordance with the recommendations of the Board or, should 10the Chairman disagree with any recommendation of disposition 11of the Self-Insurer's Advisory Board, he shall within 30 days 12of receipt of such recommendation provide to the Board in 13writing the reasons supporting his decision. The Chairman 14shall also promptly notify the employer of his decision within 1515 days of receipt of the recommendation of the Board.16    If an employer is denied a renewal of self-insurance 17privileges pursuant to application it shall retain said 18privilege for 120 days after receipt of a notice of 19cancellation of the privilege from the Chairman of the 20Commission.21    All orders made by the Chairman under this Section shall 22be subject to review by the courts, such review to be taken in 23the same manner and within the same time as provided by 24subsection (f) of Section 19 of this Act for review of awards 25and decisions of the Commission, upon the party seeking the 26review filing with the clerk of the court to which such review   HB5228 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1is taken a bond in an amount to be fixed and approved by the 2court to which the review is taken, conditioned upon the 3payment of all compensation awarded against the person taking 4such review pending a decision thereof and further conditioned 5upon such other obligations as the court may impose. Upon the 6review the Circuit Court shall have power to review all 7questions of fact as well as of law.8(Source: P.A. 101-384, eff. 1-1-20; 102-37, eff. 7-1-21; 9103-590, eff. 6-5-24.) 10    (820 ILCS 305/7)11    Sec. 7. The amount of compensation which shall be paid for 12an accidental injury to the employee resulting in death is:13    (a) If the employee leaves surviving a widow, widower, 14child or children, the applicable weekly compensation rate 15computed in accordance with subparagraph 2 of paragraph (b) of 16Section 8, shall be payable during the life of the widow or 17widower and if any surviving child or children shall not be 18physically or mentally incapacitated then until the death of 19the widow or widower or until the youngest child shall reach 20the age of 18, whichever shall come later; provided that if 21such child or children shall be enrolled as a full-time 22student in any accredited educational institution, the 23payments shall continue until such child has attained the age 24of 25. In the event any surviving child or children shall be 25physically or mentally incapacitated, the payments shall   HB5228 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1continue for the duration of such incapacity.2    The term "child" means a child whom the deceased employee 3left surviving, including a posthumous child, a child legally 4adopted, a child whom the deceased employee was legally 5obligated to support or a child to whom the deceased employee 6stood in loco parentis. The term "children" means the plural 7of "child".8    The term "physically or mentally incapacitated child or 9children" means a child or children incapable of engaging in 10regular and substantial gainful employment.11    In the event of the remarriage of a widow or widower, where 12the decedent did not leave surviving any child or children 13who, at the time of such remarriage, are entitled to 14compensation benefits under this Act, the surviving spouse 15shall be paid a lump sum equal to 2 years compensation benefits 16and all further rights of such widow or widower shall be 17extinguished.18    If the employee leaves surviving any child or children 19under 18 years of age who at the time of death shall be 20entitled to compensation under this paragraph (a) of this 21Section, the weekly compensation payments herein provided for 22such child or children shall in any event continue for a period 23of not less than 6 years.24    Any beneficiary entitled to compensation under this 25paragraph (a) of this Section shall receive from the special 26fund provided in paragraph (f) of this Section, in addition to   HB5228 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1the compensation herein provided, supplemental benefits in 2accordance with paragraph (g) of Section 8.3    (b) If no compensation is payable under paragraph (a) of 4this Section and the employee leaves surviving a parent or 5parents who at the time of the accident were totally dependent 6upon the earnings of the employee then weekly payments equal 7to the compensation rate payable in the case where the 8employee leaves surviving a widow or widower, shall be paid to 9such parent or parents for the duration of their lives, and in 10the event of the death of either, for the life of the survivor.11    (c) If no compensation is payable under paragraph (a) or 12(b) of this Section and the employee leaves surviving any 13child or children who are not entitled to compensation under 14the foregoing paragraph (a) but who at the time of the accident 15were nevertheless in any manner dependent upon the earnings of 16the employee, or leaves surviving a parent or parents who at 17the time of the accident were partially dependent upon the 18earnings of the employee, then there shall be paid to such 19dependent or dependents for a period of 8 years weekly 20compensation payments at such proportion of the applicable 21rate if the employee had left surviving a widow or widower as 22such dependency bears to total dependency. In the event of the 23death of any such beneficiary the share of such beneficiary 24shall be divided equally among the surviving beneficiaries and 25in the event of the death of the last such beneficiary all the 26rights under this paragraph shall be extinguished.  HB5228 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    (d) If no compensation is payable under paragraph (a), 2(b), or (c) of this Section and the employee leaves surviving 3any grandparent, grandparents, grandchild or grandchildren or 4collateral heirs dependent upon the employee's earnings to the 5extent of 50% or more of total dependency, then there shall be 6paid to such dependent or dependents for a period of 5 years 7weekly compensation payments at such proportion of the 8applicable rate if the employee had left surviving a widow or 9widower as such dependency bears to total dependency. In the 10event of the death of any such beneficiary the share of such 11beneficiary shall be divided equally among the surviving 12beneficiaries and in the event of the death of the last such 13beneficiary all rights hereunder shall be extinguished.14    (e) The compensation to be paid for accidental injury 15which results in death, as provided in this Section, shall be 16paid to the persons who form the basis for determining the 17amount of compensation to be paid by the employer, the 18respective shares to be in the proportion of their respective 19dependency at the time of the accident on the earnings of the 20deceased. The Commission or an Arbitrator thereof may, in its 21or his discretion, order or award the payment to the parent or 22grandparent of a child for the latter's support the amount of 23compensation which but for such order or award would have been 24paid to such child as its share of the compensation payable, 25which order or award may be modified from time to time by the 26Commission in its discretion with respect to the person to   HB5228 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1whom shall be paid the amount of the order or award remaining 2unpaid at the time of the modification.3    The payments of compensation by the employer in accordance 4with the order or award of the Commission discharges such 5employer from all further obligation as to such compensation.6    (f) The sum of $10,000 $8,000 for burial expenses shall be 7paid by the employer to the widow or widower, other dependent, 8next of kin or to the person or persons incurring the expense 9of burial.10    In the event the employer failed to provide necessary 11first aid, medical, surgical or hospital service, he shall pay 12the cost thereof to the person or persons entitled to 13compensation under paragraphs (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this 14Section, or to the person or persons incurring the obligation 15therefore, or providing the same.16    On January 15 and July 15, 1981, and on January 15 and July 1715 of each year thereafter the employer shall within 60 days 18pay a sum equal to 1/8 of 1% of all compensation payments made 19by him after July 1, 1980, either under this Act or the 20Workers' Occupational Diseases Act, whether by lump sum 21settlement or weekly compensation payments, but not including 22hospital, surgical or rehabilitation payments, made during the 23first 6 months and during the second 6 months respectively of 24the fiscal year next preceding the date of the payments, into a 25special fund which shall be designated the "Second Injury 26Fund", of which the State Treasurer is ex officio custodian,   HB5228 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1such special fund to be held and disbursed for the purposes 2hereinafter stated in paragraphs (f) and (g) of Section 8, 3either upon the order of the Commission or of a competent 4court. Said special fund shall be deposited the same as are 5State funds and any interest accruing thereon shall be added 6thereto every 6 months. It is subject to audit the same as 7State funds and accounts and is protected by the General bond 8given by the State Treasurer. It is considered always 9appropriated for the purposes of disbursements as provided in 10paragraph (f) of Section 8 of this Act, and shall be paid out 11and disbursed as therein provided and shall not at any time be 12appropriated or diverted to any other use or purpose.13    On January 15, 1991, the employer shall further pay a sum 14equal to one half of 1% of all compensation payments made by 15him from January 1, 1990 through June 30, 1990 either under 16this Act or under the Workers' Occupational Diseases Act, 17whether by lump sum settlement or weekly compensation 18payments, but not including hospital, surgical or 19rehabilitation payments, into an additional Special Fund which 20shall be designated as the "Rate Adjustment Fund". On March 2115, 1991, the employer shall pay into the Rate Adjustment Fund 22a sum equal to one half of 1% of all such compensation payments 23made from July 1, 1990 through December 31, 1990. Within 60 24days after July 15, 1991, the employer shall pay into the Rate 25Adjustment Fund a sum equal to one half of 1% of all such 26compensation payments made from January 1, 1991 through June   HB5228 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b130, 1991. Within 60 days after January 15 of 1992 and each 2subsequent year through 1996, the employer shall pay into the 3Rate Adjustment Fund a sum equal to one half of 1% of all such 4compensation payments made in the last 6 months of the 5preceding calendar year. Within 60 days after July 15 of 1992 6and each subsequent year through 1995, the employer shall pay 7into the Rate Adjustment Fund a sum equal to one half of 1% of 8all such compensation payments made in the first 6 months of 9the same calendar year. Within 60 days after January 15 of 1997 10and each subsequent year through 2005, the employer shall pay 11into the Rate Adjustment Fund a sum equal to three-fourths of 121% of all such compensation payments made in the last 6 months 13of the preceding calendar year. Within 60 days after July 15 of 141996 and each subsequent year through 2004, the employer shall 15pay into the Rate Adjustment Fund a sum equal to three-fourths 16of 1% of all such compensation payments made in the first 6 17months of the same calendar year. Within 60 days after July 15 18of 2005, the employer shall pay into the Rate Adjustment Fund a 19sum equal to 1% of such compensation payments made in the first 206 months of the same calendar year. Within 60 days after 21January 15 of 2006 and each subsequent year through 2024, the 22employer shall pay into the Rate Adjustment Fund a sum equal to 231.25% of such compensation payments made in the last 6 months 24of the preceding calendar year. Within 60 days after July 15 of 252006 and each subsequent year through 2023, the employer shall 26pay into the Rate Adjustment Fund a sum equal to 1.25% of such   HB5228 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1compensation payments made in the first 6 months of the same 2calendar year. Within 60 days after July 15 of 2024 and each 3subsequent year thereafter, the employer shall pay into the 4Rate Adjustment Fund a sum equal to 1.375% of such 5compensation payments made in the first 6 months of the same 6calendar year. Within 60 days after January 15 of 2025 and each 7subsequent year thereafter, the employer shall pay into the 8Rate Adjustment Fund a sum equal to 1.375% of such 9compensation payments made in the last 6 months of the 10preceding calendar year. The administrative costs of 11collecting assessments from employers for the Rate Adjustment 12Fund shall be paid from the Rate Adjustment Fund. The cost of 13an actuarial audit of the Fund shall be paid from the Rate 14Adjustment Fund. The State Treasurer is ex officio custodian 15of such Special Fund and the same shall be held and disbursed 16for the purposes hereinafter stated in paragraphs (f) and (g) 17of Section 8 upon the order of the Commission or of a competent 18court. The Rate Adjustment Fund shall be deposited the same as 19are State funds and any interest accruing thereon shall be 20added thereto every 6 months. It shall be subject to audit the 21same as State funds and accounts and shall be protected by the 22general bond given by the State Treasurer. It is considered 23always appropriated for the purposes of disbursements as 24provided in paragraphs (f) and (g) of Section 8 of this Act and 25shall be paid out and disbursed as therein provided and shall 26not at any time be appropriated or diverted to any other use or   HB5228 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1purpose. Within 5 days after December 7, 1990 (the effective 2date of Public Act 86-1448), the Comptroller and the State 3Treasurer shall transfer $1,000,000 from the General Revenue 4Fund to the Rate Adjustment Fund. By February 15, 1991, the 5Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall transfer $1,000,000 6from the Rate Adjustment Fund to the General Revenue Fund. The 7Comptroller and Treasurer are authorized to make transfers at 8the request of the Chairman up to a total of $19,000,000 from 9the Second Injury Fund, the General Revenue Fund, and the 10Workers' Compensation Benefit Trust Fund to the Rate 11Adjustment Fund to the extent that there is insufficient money 12in the Rate Adjustment Fund to pay claims and obligations. 13Amounts may be transferred from the General Revenue Fund only 14if the funds in the Second Injury Fund or the Workers' 15Compensation Benefit Trust Fund are insufficient to pay claims 16and obligations of the Rate Adjustment Fund. All amounts 17transferred from the Second Injury Fund, the General Revenue 18Fund, and the Workers' Compensation Benefit Trust Fund shall 19be repaid from the Rate Adjustment Fund within 270 days of a 20transfer, together with interest at the rate earned by moneys 21on deposit in the Fund or Funds from which the moneys were 22transferred.23    Upon a finding by the Commission, after reasonable notice 24and hearing, that any employer has willfully and knowingly 25failed to pay the proper amounts into the Second Injury Fund or 26the Rate Adjustment Fund required by this Section or if such   HB5228 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1payments are not made within the time periods prescribed by 2this Section, the employer shall, in addition to such 3payments, pay a penalty of 20% of the amount required to be 4paid or $2,500, whichever is greater, for each year or part 5thereof of such failure to pay. This penalty shall only apply 6to obligations of an employer to the Second Injury Fund or the 7Rate Adjustment Fund accruing after December 18, 1989 (the 8effective date of Public Act 86-998). All or part of such a 9penalty may be waived by the Commission for good cause shown.10    Any obligations of an employer to the Second Injury Fund 11and Rate Adjustment Fund accruing prior to December 18, 1989 12(the effective date of Public Act 86-998) shall be paid in full 13by such employer within 5 years of December 18, 1989 (the 14effective date of Public Act 86-998), with at least one-fifth 15of such obligation to be paid during each year following 16December 18, 1989 (the effective date of Public Act 86-998). 17If the Commission finds, following reasonable notice and 18hearing, that an employer has failed to make timely payment of 19any obligation accruing under the preceding sentence, the 20employer shall, in addition to all other payments required by 21this Section, be liable for a penalty equal to 20% of the 22overdue obligation or $2,500, whichever is greater, for each 23year or part thereof that obligation is overdue. All or part of 24such a penalty may be waived by the Commission for good cause 25shown.26    The Chairman of the Illinois Workers' Compensation   HB5228 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1Commission shall, annually, furnish to the Director of the 2Department of Insurance a list of the amounts paid into the 3Second Injury Fund and the Rate Adjustment Fund by each 4insurance company on behalf of their insured employers. The 5Director shall verify to the Chairman that the amounts paid by 6each insurance company are accurate as best as the Director 7can determine from the records available to the Director. The 8Chairman shall verify that the amounts paid by each 9self-insurer are accurate as best as the Chairman can 10determine from records available to the Chairman. The Chairman 11may require each self-insurer to provide information 12concerning the total compensation payments made upon which 13contributions to the Second Injury Fund and the Rate 14Adjustment Fund are predicated and any additional information 15establishing that such payments have been made into these 16funds. Any deficiencies in payments noted by the Director or 17Chairman shall be subject to the penalty provisions of this 18Act.19    The State Treasurer, or his duly authorized 20representative, shall be named as a party to all proceedings 21in all cases involving claim for the loss of, or the permanent 22and complete loss of the use of one eye, one foot, one leg, one 23arm or one hand.24    The State Treasurer or his duly authorized agent shall 25have the same rights as any other party to the proceeding, 26including the right to petition for review of any award. The   HB5228 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1reasonable expenses of litigation, such as medical 2examinations, testimony, and transcript of evidence, incurred 3by the State Treasurer or his duly authorized representative, 4shall be borne by the Second Injury Fund.5    If the award is not paid within 30 days after the date the 6award has become final, the Commission shall proceed to take 7judgment thereon in its own name as is provided for other 8awards by paragraph (g) of Section 19 of this Act and take the 9necessary steps to collect the award.10    Any person, corporation or organization who has paid or 11become liable for the payment of burial expenses of the 12deceased employee may in his or its own name institute 13proceedings before the Commission for the collection thereof.14    For the purpose of administration, receipts and 15disbursements, the Special Fund provided for in paragraph (f) 16of this Section shall be administered jointly with the Special 17Fund provided for in paragraph (f) of Section 7 of the Workers' 18Occupational Diseases Act.19    (g) All compensation, except for burial expenses provided 20in this Section to be paid in case accident results in death, 21shall be paid in installments equal to the percentage of the 22average earnings as provided for in paragraph (b) of Section 8 23of this Act, at the same intervals at which the wages or 24earnings of the employees were paid. If this is not feasible, 25then the installments shall be paid weekly. Such compensation 26may be paid in a lump sum upon petition as provided in Section   HB5228 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b19 of this Act. However, in addition to the benefits provided by 2Section 9 of this Act where compensation for death is payable 3to the deceased's widow, widower or to the deceased's widow, 4widower and one or more children, and where a partial lump sum 5is applied for by such beneficiary or beneficiaries within 18 6months after the deceased's death, the Commission may, in its 7discretion, grant a partial lump sum of not to exceed 100 weeks 8of the compensation capitalized at their present value upon 9the basis of interest calculated at 3% per annum with annual 10rests, upon a showing that such partial lump sum is for the 11best interest of such beneficiary or beneficiaries.12    (h) In case the injured employee is under 16 years of age 13at the time of the accident and is illegally employed, the 14amount of compensation payable under paragraphs (a), (b), (c), 15(d), and (f) of this Section shall be increased 50%.16    Nothing herein contained repeals or amends the provisions 17of the Child Labor Law of 2024 relating to the employment of 18minors under the age of 16 years.19    However, where an employer has on file an employment 20certificate issued pursuant to the Child Labor Law of 2024 or 21work permit issued pursuant to the Federal Fair Labor 22Standards Act, as amended, or a birth certificate properly and 23duly issued, such certificate, permit or birth certificate is 24conclusive evidence as to the age of the injured minor 25employee for the purposes of this Section only.26    (i) Whenever the dependents of a deceased employee are   HB5228 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1noncitizens not residing in the United States, Mexico or 2Canada, the amount of compensation payable is limited to the 3beneficiaries described in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of 4this Section and is 50% of the compensation provided in 5paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this Section, except as 6otherwise provided by treaty.7    In a case where any of the persons who would be entitled to 8compensation is living at any place outside of the United 9States, then payment shall be made to the personal 10representative of the deceased employee. The distribution by 11such personal representative to the persons entitled shall be 12made to such persons and in such manner as the Commission 13orders.14(Source: P.A. 103-590, eff. 6-5-24; 103-721, eff. 1-1-25; 15104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 16    (820 ILCS 305/8.7)17    Sec. 8.7. Utilization review programs.18    (a) As used in this Section:19    "Utilization review" means the evaluation of proposed or 20provided health care services to determine the appropriateness 21of both the level of health care services medically necessary 22and the quality of health care services provided to a patient, 23including evaluation of their efficiency, efficacy, and 24appropriateness of treatment, hospitalization, or office 25visits based on medically accepted standards. The evaluation   HB5228 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1must be accomplished by means of a system that identifies the 2utilization of health care services based on standards of care 3of nationally recognized peer review guidelines as well as 4nationally recognized treatment guidelines and evidence-based 5medicine based upon standards as provided in this Act. 6Utilization techniques may include prospective review, second 7opinions, concurrent review, discharge planning, peer review, 8independent medical examinations, and retrospective review 9(for purposes of this sentence, retrospective review shall be 10applicable to services rendered on or after July 20, 2005). 11Nothing in this Section applies to prospective review of 12necessary first aid or emergency treatment.13    (b) No person may conduct a utilization review program for 14workers' compensation services in this State unless once every 152 years the person registers the utilization review program 16with the Department of Insurance and certifies compliance with 17the Workers' Compensation Utilization Management standards or 18Health Utilization Management Standards of URAC sufficient to 19achieve URAC accreditation or submits evidence of 20accreditation by URAC for its Workers' Compensation 21Utilization Management Standards or Health Utilization 22Management Standards. Nothing in this Act shall be construed 23to require an employer or insurer or its subcontractors to 24become URAC accredited.25    (c) In addition, the Director of Insurance may certify 26alternative utilization review standards of national   HB5228 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1accreditation organizations or entities in order for plans to 2comply with this Section. Any alternative utilization review 3standards shall meet or exceed those standards required under 4subsection (b).5    (d) This registration shall include submission of all of 6the following information regarding utilization review program 7activities:8        (1) The name, address, and telephone number of the 9    utilization review programs.10        (2) The organization and governing structure of the 11    utilization review programs.12        (3) The number of lives for which utilization review 13    is conducted by each utilization review program.14        (4) Hours of operation of each utilization review 15    program.16        (5) Description of the grievance process for each 17    utilization review program.18        (6) Number of covered lives for which utilization 19    review was conducted for the previous calendar year for 20    each utilization review program.21        (7) Written policies and procedures for protecting 22    confidential information according to applicable State and 23    federal laws for each utilization review program.24    (e) A utilization review program shall have written 25procedures to ensure that patient-specific information 26obtained during the process of utilization review will be:  HB5228 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1        (1) kept confidential in accordance with applicable 2    State and federal laws; and3        (2) shared only with the employee, the employee's 4    designee, and the employee's health care provider, and 5    those who are authorized by law to receive the 6    information. Summary data shall not be considered 7    confidential if it does not provide information to allow 8    identification of individual patients or health care 9    providers.10    Only a health care professional may make determinations 11regarding the medical necessity of health care services during 12the course of utilization review. Any adverse determination 13shall be made by a physician if the health care services are to 14be delivered or recommended by a physician. The reviewing 15physician shall have:16        (1) a current and valid nonrestricted license in any 17    United States jurisdiction and a current certification by 18    a recognized American medical specialty board in the area 19    or areas appropriate to the subject of the review; and20        (2) experience treating and managing patients with the 21    medical condition or disease for which the health care 22    service is being requested.23    Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, a 24licensed health care professional who satisfies the 25requirements of this subsection may make an adverse 26determination of a service request submitted by a health care   HB5228 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1professional licensed in the same profession. 2    When making retrospective reviews, utilization review 3programs shall base reviews solely on the medical information 4available to the attending physician or ordering provider at 5the time the health care services were provided.6    (f) If the Department of Insurance finds that a 7utilization review program is not in compliance with this 8Section, the Department shall issue a corrective action plan 9and allow a reasonable amount of time for compliance with the 10plan. If the utilization review program does not come into 11compliance, the Department may issue a cease and desist order. 12Before issuing a cease and desist order under this Section, 13the Department shall provide the utilization review program 14with a written notice of the reasons for the order and allow a 15reasonable amount of time to supply additional information 16demonstrating compliance with the requirements of this Section 17and to request a hearing. The hearing notice shall be sent by 18certified mail, return receipt requested, and the hearing 19shall be conducted in accordance with the Illinois 20Administrative Procedure Act.21    (g) A utilization review program subject to a corrective 22action may continue to conduct business until a final decision 23has been issued by the Department.24    (h) The Department of Insurance may by rule establish a 25registration fee for each person conducting a utilization 26review program.  HB5228 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    (i) Upon receipt of written notice that the employer or 2the employer's agent or insurer wishes to invoke the 3utilization review process, the provider of medical, surgical, 4or hospital services shall submit to the utilization review, 5following accredited procedural guidelines.6        (1) The provider shall make reasonable efforts to 7    provide timely and complete reports of clinical 8    information needed to support a request for treatment. If 9    the provider fails to make such reasonable efforts, the 10    charges for the treatment or service may not be 11    compensable nor collectible by the provider or claimant 12    from the employer, the employer's agent, or the employee. 13    The reporting obligations of providers shall not be 14    unreasonable or unduly burdensome.15        (2) Written notice of utilization review decisions, 16    including the clinical rationale for certification or 17    non-certification and references to applicable standards 18    of care or evidence-based medical guidelines, shall be 19    furnished to the provider and employee. The certification 20    shall be valid for the 3 months immediately after the date 21    on which the employee and health care provider receive the 22    certification or for the length of treatment as determined 23    by the employee's health care provider. If the 24    certification is for a proposed surgery, it shall be 25    inclusive of 3 months of postoperative health care 26    services as clinically indicated by the treating health   HB5228 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    care professional or for the length of treatment as 2    determined by the petitioner's treating health care 3    professional, completed by a licensed health care 4    professional.5        (2-5) A non-certification may be appealed. All appeals 6    shall be reviewed by a physician if the health care 7    services are to be delivered or recommended by a 8    physician. The reviewing physician shall have:9            (A) a current and valid nonrestricted license in 10        any United States jurisdiction and a current 11        certification by a recognized American medical 12        specialty board and, where applicable, subspecialty 13        board in the area or areas appropriate to the subject 14        of the review; and15            (B) experience treating and managing patients with 16        the medical condition or disease for which the health 17        care service is being requested.18        Notwithstanding the provisions of this paragraph, a 19    licensed health care professional who satisfies the 20    requirements of this subsection may make an adverse 21    determination of a service request submitted by a health 22    care professional licensed in the same profession. 23        (3) An employer may only deny payment of or refuse to 24    authorize payment of medical services rendered or proposed 25    to be rendered on the grounds that the extent and scope of 26    medical treatment is excessive and unnecessary in   HB5228 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    compliance with an accredited utilization review program 2    under this Section.3        (4) When a payment for medical services has been 4    denied or not authorized by an employer or when 5    authorization for medical services is denied pursuant to 6    utilization review, the employee has the burden of proof 7    to show by a preponderance of the evidence that a variance 8    from the standards of care used by the person or entity 9    performing the utilization review pursuant to subsection 10    (a) is reasonably required to cure or relieve the effects 11    of his or her injury.12        (5) The medical professional responsible for review in 13    the final stage of utilization review or appeal must be 14    available in this State for interview or deposition; or 15    must be available for deposition by telephone, video 16    conference, or other remote electronic means. A medical 17    professional who works or resides in this State or outside 18    of this State may comply with this requirement by making 19    himself or herself available for an interview or 20    deposition in person or by making himself or herself 21    available by telephone, video conference, or other remote 22    electronic means. The remote interview or deposition shall 23    be conducted in a fair, open, and cost-effective manner. 24    The expense of interview and the deposition method shall 25    be paid by the employer. The deponent shall be in the 26    presence of the officer administering the oath and   HB5228 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1    recording the deposition, unless otherwise agreed by the 2    parties. Any exhibits or other demonstrative evidence to 3    be presented to the deponent by any party at the 4    deposition shall be provided to the officer administering 5    the oath and all other parties within a reasonable period 6    of time prior to the deposition. Nothing shall prohibit 7    any party from being with the deponent during the 8    deposition, at that party's expense; provided, however, 9    that a party attending a deposition shall give written 10    notice of that party's intention to appear at the 11    deposition to all other parties within a reasonable time 12    prior to the deposition.13    An admissible utilization review shall be considered by 14the Commission, along with all other evidence and in the same 15manner as all other evidence, and must be addressed along with 16all other evidence in the determination of the reasonableness 17and necessity of the medical bills or treatment. Nothing in 18this Section shall be construed to diminish the rights of 19employees to reasonable and necessary medical treatment or 20employee choice of health care provider under Section 8(a) or 21the rights of employers to medical examinations under Section 2212.23    (j) When an employer denies payment of or refuses to 24authorize payment of first aid, medical, surgical, or hospital 25services under Section 8(a) of this Act, if that denial or 26refusal to authorize complies with a utilization review   HB5228 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1program registered under this Section and complies with all 2other requirements of this Section, then there shall be a 3rebuttable presumption that the employer shall not be 4responsible for payment of additional compensation pursuant to 5Section 19(k) of this Act and if that denial or refusal to 6authorize does not comply with a utilization review program 7registered under this Section and does not comply with all 8other requirements of this Section, then that will be 9considered by the Commission, along with all other evidence 10and in the same manner as all other evidence, in the 11determination of whether the employer may be responsible for 12the payment of additional compensation pursuant to Section 1319(k) of this Act.14    The changes to this Section made by this amendatory Act of 15the 97th General Assembly apply only to health care services 16provided or proposed to be provided on or after September 1, 172011. 18(Source: P.A. 97-18, eff. 6-28-11.) 19    (820 ILCS 305/12)  (from Ch. 48, par. 138.12)20    Sec. 12. An employee entitled to receive disability 21payments shall be required, if requested by the employer, to 22submit himself, at the expense of the employer, for 23examination to a duly qualified medical practitioner or 24surgeon selected by the employer, at any time and place 25reasonably convenient for the employee, either within or   HB5228 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1without the State of Illinois, for the purpose of determining 2the nature, extent and probable duration of the injury 3received by the employee, and for the purpose of ascertaining 4the amount of compensation which may be due the employee from 5time to time for disability according to the provisions of 6this Act. An employee may also be required to submit himself 7for examination by medical experts under subsection (c) of 8Section 19.9    If an employer asks a medical practitioner for an 10examination of the reasonableness and necessity of the medical 11services proposed or provided under subsection (a) of Section 128, instead of a utilization review under Section 8.7, the 13examination required under this Section and the report of the 14examination shall be provided by the medical practitioner to 15the employee or the employee's representative and the 16employee's treating health care professional within 90 days 17after receipt of the request for the examination of the 18reasonableness and necessity of treatment. The 90-day period 19begins when the employer receives the medical records from the 20treating health care professional requesting the medical 21service. The employer or the employer's representative shall 22exercise due diligence in requesting and collecting the 23employee's medical records in accordance with all applicable 24laws. The medical practitioner who performs the examination to 25determine the reasonableness and necessity of treatment shall 26be board certified in the same specialty as the treating   HB5228 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1health care professional. If the employer fails to comply with 2this paragraph after receiving the medical records from the 3treating health care professional requesting the medical 4service, there is a rebuttable presumption that the employer 5shall be responsible for the payment of additional 6compensation under Section 16 and subsection (l) of Section 719. This paragraph applies to the failure to authorize or 8approve treatment as well as the failure to pay for treatment. 9    An employer requesting such an examination, of an employee 10residing within the State of Illinois, shall deliver to the 11employee with the notice of the time and place of examination 12sufficient money to defray the necessary expense of travel by 13the most convenient means to and from the place of 14examination, and the cost of meals necessary during the trip, 15and if the examination or travel to and from the place of 16examination causes any loss of working time on the part of the 17employee, the employer shall reimburse him for such loss of 18wages upon the basis of his average daily wage. Such 19examination shall be made in the presence of a duly qualified 20medical practitioner or surgeon provided and paid for by the 21employee, if such employee so desires.22    In all cases where the examination is made by a surgeon 23engaged by the employer, and the injured employee has no 24surgeon present at such examination, it shall be the duty of 25the surgeon making the examination at the instance of the 26employer to deliver to the injured employee, or his   HB5228 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1representative, a statement in writing of the condition and 2extent of the injury to the same extent that said surgeon 3reports to the employer and the same shall be an exact copy of 4that furnished to the employer, said copy to be furnished the 5employee, or his representative as soon as practicable but not 6later than 48 hours before the time the case is set for 7hearing. Such delivery shall be made in person either to the 8employee or his representative, or by registered mail to 9either, and the receipt of either shall be proof of such 10delivery. If such surgeon refuses to furnish the employee with 11such statement to the same extent as that furnished the 12employer said surgeon shall not be permitted to testify at the 13hearing next following said examination.14    If the employee refuses so to submit himself to 15examination or unnecessarily obstructs the same, his right to 16compensation payments shall be temporarily suspended until 17such examination shall have taken place, and no compensation 18shall be payable under this Act for such period.19    It shall be the duty of surgeons treating an injured 20employee who is likely to die, and treating him at the instance 21of the employer, to have called in another surgeon to be 22designated and paid for by either the injured employee or by 23the person or persons who would become his beneficiary or 24beneficiaries, to make an examination before the death of such 25injured employee.26    In all cases where the examination is made by a surgeon   HB5228 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 20014 SPS 33465 b1engaged by the injured employee, and the employer has no 2surgeon present at such examination, it shall be the duty of 3the surgeon making the examination at the instance of the 4employee, to deliver to the employer, or his representative, a 5statement in writing of the condition and extent of the injury 6to the same extent that said surgeon reports to the employee 7and the same shall be an exact copy of that furnished to the 8employee, said copy to be furnished the employer, or his 9representative, as soon as practicable but not later than 48 10hours before the time the case is set for hearing. Such 11delivery shall be made in person either to the employer, or his 12representative, or by registered mail to either, and the 13receipt of either shall be proof of such delivery. If such 14surgeon refuses to furnish the employer with such statement to 15the same extent as that furnished the employee, said surgeon 16shall not be permitted to testify at the hearing next 17following said examination.18(Source: P.A. 94-277, eff. 7-20-05.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.